Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-608
Rules and regulations; enforcement; arrest and detention authorized.

Any law enforcement official, including any conservation officer, may enforce sections 37-305 to 37-313, the rules and regulations established under the authority of sections 60-680 and 60-6,190, and federal orders restricting access to federal lands under a memorandum of understanding or cooperative agreement with a federal agency. When a violation has occurred in or on any area under the ownership or control of the commission or federal lands as authorized under this section, any conservation officer may arrest and detain any person committing such violation or committing any misdemeanor or felony as provided by the laws of this state or federal orders as authorized under this section until a legal warrant can be obtained.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 298;

Laws 2002, LB 1003, § 31.